Nebraska, session 109, LB1227.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1227 LB1227
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-6406 (1)(a) Any county, city, or village may enact, administer,
or enforce a local building or construction code if or as long as such
county, city, or village:
(i) Adopts the state building code; or
(ii) Adopts a building or construction code that conforms generally
with the state building code.
(b) If a county, city, or village does not adopt a code as
authorized under subdivision (a) of this subsection within two years
after an update to the state building code, the state building code shall
apply in the county, city, or village, except that such code shall not
apply to construction on a farm or for farm purposes.
(2) A local building or construction code shall be deemed to conform
generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Adopts a special or differing building standard by amending,
modifying, or deleting any portion of the state building code in order to
reduce unnecessary costs of construction, increase safety, durability, or
efficiency, establish best building or construction practices within the
county, city, or village, or address special local conditions within the
county, city, or village;
(b) Adopts any supplement, new edition, appendix, or component or
combination of components of the state building code;
(c) Adopts any of the following:
(i) Section 305 or 310 of the 2018 edition of the International
Building Code without the exceptions described in subdivision (1)(a) of
section 71-6403;
(ii) Section 101.4.3 or any portion of chapter 29 of the 2018
edition of the International Building Code;
(iii) Section R313 or any portion of chapters 25 through 33 of the
2018 edition of the International Residential Code; or
-2-

LB1227 LB1227
2026 2026
(iv) Section 809 of the 2018 edition of the International Existing
Building Code;
(d) Adopts a plumbing code, an electrical code, a fire prevention
code, or any other standard code as authorized under section 14-419,
15-905, 18-132, or 23-172;
(e) Adopts a local energy code as authorized under section 81-1618;
or
(f) Adopts minimum standards for radon resistant new construction
which meet the minimum standards adopted under section 76-3504.
(3) A local building or construction code shall not be deemed to
conform generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Includes a prior edition of any component or combination of
components of the state building code; or
(b) Does not include minimum standards for radon resistant new
construction that meet the minimum standards adopted under section
76-3504.
(4) A county, city, or village shall notify the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment if it amends or modifies its local building or
construction code in such a way as to delete any portion of (a) chapter
13 of the 2018 edition of the International Building Code or (b) chapter
11 of the 2018 edition of the International Residential Code. The
notification shall be made within thirty days after the adoption of such
amendment or modification.
(5) A county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a local
electrical code that provides standards that are different than those
prescribed by the State Electrical Board pursuant to the State Electrical
Act, except that a county, city, or village may provide for the
inspection of electrical installations by a certified electrical
inspector.
(6) (5) A county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a
local building or construction code other than as provided by this
-3-

LB1227 LB1227
2026 2026
section.
(7) (6) A county, city, or village which adopts or enforces a local
building or construction code under this section shall regularly update
its code. For purposes of this section, a code shall be deemed to be
regularly updated if the most recently enacted state building code or a
code that conforms generally with the state building code is adopted by
the county, city, or village within two years after an update to the
state building code.
(8) (7) A county, city, or village may adopt amendments for the
proper administration and enforcement of its local building or
construction code including organization of enforcement, qualifications
of staff members, examination of plans, inspections, appeals, permits,
and fees. Any amendment adopted pursuant to this section shall be
published separately from the local building or construction code. Any
local building or construction code adopted under subdivision (1)(a) of
this section or the state building code if applicable under subdivision
(1)(b) of this section shall be the legally applicable code regardless of
whether the county, city, or village has provided for the administration
or enforcement of its local building or construction code under this
subsection.
(9) (8) A county, city, or village which adopts one or more standard
codes as part of its local building or construction code under this
section shall keep at least one copy of each adopted code, or portion
thereof, for use and examination by the public in the office of the clerk
of the county, city, or village prior to the adoption of the code and as
long as such code is in effect.
(10) (9) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Building Construction
Act, a public building of any political subdivision shall be built in
accordance with the applicable local building or construction code. Fees,
if any, for services which monitor a builder's application of codes shall
be negotiable between the political subdivisions involved, but such fees
-4-

LB1227 LB1227
2026 2026
shall not exceed the actual expenses incurred by the county, city, or
village doing the monitoring.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1618 (1) Any county, city, or village may adopt and enforce a
local energy code. Prior to adopting any new local energy codes a county,
city, or village shall determine whether the new local energy code is
cost efficient. A county, city, or village shall not adopt a new local
energy code such county, city, or village determines is not cost-
efficient. Such local energy code shall be deemed equivalent to the
Nebraska Energy Code if it does not result in energy consumption greater
than would result from the strict application of the Nebraska Energy Code
and is reasonably consistent with the intent of sections 81-1608 to
81-1626. Any building or portion thereof subject to the jurisdiction of
and inspected by such county, city, or village shall be deemed to comply
with sections 81-1608 to 81-1626 if it meets the standards of such local
energy code. Such county, city, or village may by ordinance or resolution
prescribe a schedule of fees sufficient to pay the costs incurred
pursuant to sections 81-1608 to 81-1626.
(2) Any county, city, or village which adopts and enforces a local
energy code may waive a specific requirement of the Nebraska Energy Code
when meeting such requirement is not economically justified. The local
code authority shall submit to the department its analysis for
determining that a specific requirement is not justified. The department
shall review such analysis and transmit its findings and conclusions to
the local code authority within a reasonable time. The local code
authority shall submit to the department its explanation as to how the
original code or any revised code addresses the issues raised by the
department. After a local code authority has submitted such explanation,
the authority may proceed to enforce its local energy code.
(3) For purposes of this section, cost efficient means that the
-5-

LB1227 LB1227
2026 2026
expected increase in costs to implement the local energy code for new
buildings is less than the expected energy cost savings in such buildings
over five years. Expected costs shall be based on the energy impact
studies published by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
Sec. 3. Section 81-2125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2125 (1) State inspection shall not apply within the jurisdiction
of any county, city, or village which provides by resolution or ordinance
standards of electrical wiring and its installation that are not less
than those prescribed by the board or by the State Electrical Act and
which further provides by resolution or ordinance for the inspection of
electrical installations within the limits of such subdivision by a
certified electrical inspector. No person other than the holder of an
electrical inspector's certificate of qualification shall be appointed to
act as electrical inspector and to enforce the act as electrical
inspector and to enforce the act or any applicable resolution or
ordinance within his or her jurisdiction. A copy of the certificate of
each electrical inspector shall be provided to the board by the political
subdivision issuing the certificate.
(2) State inspection shall not apply to routine maintenance.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-1618 and 81-2125, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-6-